Hawaii statutes.
[§658F-2] Definitions. In this
chapter:

"Foreign country" means a government
other than:

(1) The United States;

(2) A state, district, commonwealth, territory, or
insular possession of the United States; or

(3) Any other government with regard to which the
decision in this State as to whether to recognize a judgment of that
government's courts is initially subject to determination under the full faith
and credit clause of the United States Constitution.

"Foreign-country judgment" means a
judgment of a court of a foreign country. [L 2009, c 34, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next